South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S741.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 37, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-37-55.   No vaccine can be mandated for infants under the age of twenty-four months. An infant under the age of twenty-four months may receive a vaccine at the voluntary request of the infant's parents. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----